src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VERB_ENTÄÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 55 front t~n
!!€  entää: entää+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat 
0:tä  VERB_FRONT_AINF  ;
0:tä  VERB_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:nä  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:tä  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:tä  VERB_FRONT_3SG_Ä  ;
0:tä  VERB_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0+Use/NG:s  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PAST  ;
0+Use/NG:s  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:n  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:t  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:tä  VERB_FRONT_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:tä  VERB_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:ne  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:net  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:net  VERB_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;
0:tä  VERB_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS  ;

!!  Other a stems undergo a:o variation

LEXICON VERB_KASVAA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 56 back
!!€  kasvaa: kasvaa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # grow
0:a  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:a  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:a  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:a  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:a  VERB_BACK_3SG_A  ;
0:a  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:o  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:o  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:a  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:a  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:e  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:et  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:et  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:a  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_VIRKKAA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 56 back k~0
!!€  jakaa: jakaa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # share
0:ka  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:ka  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:a  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:ka  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:ka  VERB_BACK_3SG_A  ;
0:ka  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:o  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:ko  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ka  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:ka  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:e  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:et  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:et  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:ka  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_TAPPAA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 56 back p~0
!!€  tappaa: tappaa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # kill
0:pa  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:pa  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:a  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:pa  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:pa  VERB_BACK_3SG_A  ;
0:pa  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:o  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:po  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:pa  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:pa  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:e  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:et  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:et  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:pa  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_AUTTAA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 56 back t~0
!!€  auttaa: auttaa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # help
0:ta  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:a  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_3SG_A  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:o  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:to  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:e  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:et  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:et  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_SATAA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 56 back t~d
!!€  sataa: sataa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # rain
0:ta  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:da  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_3SG_A  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:do  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:to  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:de  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:det  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:det  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_KANTAA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 56 back t~n
!!€  kantaa: kantaa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # carry
0:ta  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:na  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_3SG_A  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:no  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:to  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:ne  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:net  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:net  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

!!  In some of the a:o variations the t:s variant is also possible.

LEXICON VERB_KAATAA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 57 back
!!€  kaataa: kaataa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # pour
0:ta  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:da  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_3SG_A  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:do  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0+Use/NG:s  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:to  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0+Use/NG:s  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:de  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:det  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:det  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_SAARTAA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 57 back t~r
!!€  saartaa: saartaa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # surround
0:ta  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:ra  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_3SG_A  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:ro  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0+Use/NG:s  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:to  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0+Use/NG:s  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:re  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:ret  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:ret  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

!! ### Verbs with e stems

LEXICON VERB_KYTKEÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 58 front
!!€  kytkeä: kytkeä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # switch
0:e  VERB_FRONT_AINF  ;
0:i  VERB_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:e  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:e  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:e  VERB_FRONT_3SG_E  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PAST  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:e  VERB_FRONT_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:e  VERB_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:e  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:et  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:et  VERB_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;
0:e  VERB_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_SOTKEA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 58 back
!!€  sotkea: sotkea+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # mess
0:e  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:i  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:e  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:e  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:e  VERB_BACK_3SG_E  ;
0  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:e  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:e  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:e  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:et  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:et  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:e  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_PUKEA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 58 back k~0
!!€  pukea: pukea+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # dress
0:ke  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:ki  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:e  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:ke  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:ke  VERB_BACK_3SG_E  ;
0:k  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:k  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ke  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:ke  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:e  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:et  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:et  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:ke  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_RYPEÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 58 front p~v
!!€  rypeä: rypeä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # bathe
0:pe  VERB_FRONT_AINF  ;
0:pi  VERB_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:ve  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:pe  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:pe  VERB_FRONT_3SG_E  ;
0:p  VERB_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:v  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:p  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:pe  VERB_FRONT_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:pe  VERB_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:ve  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:vet  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:vet  VERB_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;
0:pe  VERB_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_PÄTEÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 58 front t~d
!!€  päteä: päteä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # nitpick
0:te  VERB_FRONT_AINF  ;
0:ti  VERB_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:de  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:te  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:te  VERB_FRONT_3SG_E  ;
0:t  VERB_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:d  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:t  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:te  VERB_FRONT_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:te  VERB_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:de  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:det  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:det  VERB_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;
0:te  VERB_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_KUTEA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 58 back t~d
!!€  kutea: kutea+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # breed
0:te  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:ti  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:de  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:te  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:te  VERB_BACK_3SG_E  ;
0:t  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:d  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:t  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ; 
0:te  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:te  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:de  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:det  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:det  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:te  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;
