src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VERB
ahtaa+V:ah  VERB_SATAA  ;
ajaa+V:aj  VERB_KASVAA  ;
alkaa+V:al  VERB_VIRKKAA  ;
antaa% anteeksi+V:anteeksian  VERB_KANTAA  ;
antaa+V:an  VERB_KANTAA  ;
anteeksiantaa+V:anteeksian  VERB_KANTAA  ;
appaa+V:ap  VERB_TAPPAA  ;
asianajaa+V:asianaj  VERB_KASVAA  ;
auttaa+V:aut  VERB_AUTTAA  ;
edesantaa+V:edesan  VERB_KANTAA  ;
edeskantaa+V:edeskan  VERB_KANTAA  ;
edeskäydä+V:edeskäy  VERB_KYTKEÄ  ;
entää+V:en  VERB_ENTÄÄ  ;
esilleantaa+V:esillean  VERB_KANTAA  ;
esipainaa+V:esipain  VERB_KASVAA  ;
haastaa+V:haast  VERB_KASVAA  ;
haistaa+V:haist  VERB_KASVAA  ;
hakea+V:ha  VERB_PUKEA  ;
hokea+V:ho  VERB_PUKEA  ;
ilmiantaa+V:ilmian  VERB_KANTAA  ;
imeä+V:im  VERB_KYTKEÄ  ;
iskeä+V:isk  VERB_KYTKEÄ  ;
itkeä+V:itk  VERB_KYTKEÄ  ;
jakaa+V:ja  VERB_VIRKKAA  ;
jaksaa+V:jaks  VERB_KASVAA  ;
jatkaa+V:jatk  VERB_KASVAA  ;
jauhaa+V:jauh  VERB_KASVAA  ;
kaartaa+V:kaar  VERB_SAARTAA  ;
kaataa+V:kaa  VERB_KAATAA  ;
kaihtaa+V:kaih  VERB_SATAA  ;
kaipaella+V:kaipael  VERB_SOTKEA  ;
kaitsea+V:kaits  VERB_SOTKEA  ;
kaivaa+V:kaiv  VERB_KASVAA  ;
kalvaa+V:kalv  VERB_KASVAA  ;
kantaa+V:kan  VERB_KANTAA  ;
karttaa+V:kart  VERB_AUTTAA  ;
kastaa+V:kast  VERB_KASVAA  ;
kasvaa+V:kasv  VERB_KASVAA  ;
kattaa+V:kat  VERB_AUTTAA  ;
kiinnisaattaa+V:kiinnisaat  VERB_AUTTAA  ;
kitkeä+V:kitk  VERB_KYTKEÄ  ;
koeajaa+V:koeaj  VERB_KASVAA  ;
kokea+V:ko  VERB_PUKEA  ;
korjauslukea+V:korjauslu  VERB_PUKEA  ;
koskea+V:kosk  VERB_SOTKEA  ;
kutea+V:ku  VERB_KUTEA  ;
kylpeä+V:kyl  VERB_RYPEÄ  ;
kyteä+V:ky  VERB_PÄTEÄ  ;
kytkeä+V:kytk  VERB_KYTKEÄ  ;
käskeä+V:käsk  VERB_KYTKEÄ  ;
kätkeä+V:kätk  VERB_KYTKEÄ  ;
laistaa+V:laist  VERB_KASVAA  ;
laittaa+V:lait  VERB_AUTTAA  ;
lappaa+V:lap  VERB_TAPPAA  ;
laskea+V:lask  VERB_SOTKEA  ;
laulaa+V:laul  VERB_KASVAA  ;
liikkeellelaskea+V:liikkeellelask  VERB_SOTKEA  ;
liikkeeseenlaskea+V:liikkeeseenlask  VERB_SOTKEA  ;
lukea+V:lu  VERB_PUKEA  ;
maattaa+V:maat  VERB_AUTTAA  ;
mahtaa+V:mah  VERB_SATAA  ;
maistaa+V:maist  VERB_KASVAA  ;
maittaa+V:mait  VERB_AUTTAA  ;
maksaa+V:maks  VERB_KASVAA  ;
malttaa+V:malt  VERB_AUTTAA  ;
mataa+V:ma  VERB_SATAA  ;
matkaansaattaa+V:matkaansaat  VERB_AUTTAA  ;
maustaa+V:maust  VERB_KASVAA  ;
mukaanlukea+V:mukaanlu  VERB_PUKEA  ;
naittaa+V:nait  VERB_AUTTAA  ;
nauraa+V:naur  VERB_KASVAA  ;
ohiajaa+V:ohiaj  VERB_KASVAA  ;
oikolukea+V:oikolu  VERB_PUKEA  ;
paahtaa+V:paah  VERB_SATAA  ;
painaa+V:pain  VERB_KASVAA  ;
paistaa+V:paist  VERB_KASVAA  ;
palaa+V:pal  VERB_KASVAA  ;
palttaa+V:palt  VERB_AUTTAA  ;
poislukea+V:poislu  VERB_PUKEA  ;
potea+V:po  VERB_KUTEA  ;
pukea+V:pu  VERB_PUKEA  ;
puskea+V:pusk  VERB_SOTKEA  ;
päteä+V:pä  VERB_PÄTEÄ  ;
raastaa+V:raast  VERB_KASVAA  ;
raataa+V:raa  VERB_SATAA  ;
rypeä+V:ry  VERB_RYPEÄ  ;
saartaa+V:saar  VERB_SAARTAA  ;
saattaa+V:saat  VERB_AUTTAA  ;
salvaa+V:salv  VERB_KASVAA  ;
sataa+V:sa  VERB_SATAA  ;
silkkipainaa+V:silkkipain  VERB_KASVAA  ;
sisäänajaa+V:sisäänaj  VERB_KASVAA  ;
sotkea+V:sotk  VERB_SOTKEA  ;
suitsea+V:suits  VERB_SOTKEA  ;
suojamaattaa+V:suoja#maat  VERB_AUTTAA  ;
suojamaattaa+V:suojamaat  VERB_AUTTAA  ;
syteä+V:sy  VERB_PÄTEÄ  ;
taittaa+V:tait  VERB_AUTTAA  ;
tappaa+V:tap  VERB_TAPPAA  ;
tiedoksiantaa+V:tiedoksian  VERB_KANTAA  ;
toimeksiantaa+V:toimeksian  VERB_KANTAA  ;
tukea+V:tu  VERB_PUKEA  ;
uppopaistaa+V:uppopaist  VERB_KASVAA  ;
uudelleenjakaa+V:uudelleenja  VERB_VIRKKAA  ;
uudelleenlaskea+V:uudelleenlask  VERB_SOTKEA  ;
vaihtaa+V:vaih  VERB_SATAA  ;
valaa+V:val  VERB_KASVAA  ;
varttaa+V:vart  VERB_AUTTAA  ;
virkkaa+V:virk  VERB_VIRKKAA  ;
yhteenlaskea+V:yhteenlask  VERB_SOTKEA  ;
ylenantaa+V:ylenan  VERB_KANTAA  ;
ylipukea+V:ylipu  VERB_PUKEA  ;
